Massachusetts, session 194th, H570.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 38G of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as amended by section 22 of chapter 226
of the acts of 2014, is hereby further amended by adding the following paragraph:-
Any veteran, as defined by clause Forty-third of section 7 of chapter 4, who is
administered a test established pursuant to this section required for certification as a provisional
educator or a provisional educator with advanced standing shall receive 5 additional points to be
added to the total test scaled score.
of 1